Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.01.280

Certificate of existence or registration.

Any person may apply to the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.235 to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic corporation or a certificate of registration for a foreign corporation.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2106; 1991 c 72 s 27; 1989 c 165 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.